Utah statutes.
4-8-6.   Procedure for enforcement -- Notice of agency action -- Cease and
desist order -- Enforcement -- Judicial review.
(1) (a)  Whenever the department has reason to believe that a person has, or
is engaged in, the violation of this chapter, it shall issue a notice of
agency action.
(b)  If the commissioner, or a hearing officer designated by the commissioner,
determines by a preponderance of the evidence that any person named in the
complaint has engaged, or is engaging, in an act that violates this chapter,
the officer shall:
(i)  prepare written findings of fact; and
(ii)  issue an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the illegal
activity.
(2)  The department may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for
enforcement of its cease and desist order.
(3)  Any person who is subject to a cease and desist order may obtain judicial
review.
(4)  The attorney general's office shall represent the department in any
original action or appeal begun under this section.
